Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4075.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. (1). Subject to the exceptions specified in this act, the minimum hourly wage rate is: (a) a. Beginning January 1, 2019, $10.00.February 21, 2025, $12.48. (b) b. Beginning January 1, 2020, $10.65.2026, $14.00. (c) c. Beginning January 1, 2021, $11.35.2027, $15.50. (d) d. Beginning January 1, 2022, $12.00.2028, $17.00. (e) Beginning January 1, 2029, $18.50. (f) Beginning January 1, 2030, $20.00. (2) Every October beginning in October, 2022, 2030, the state treasurer shall calculate an adjusted minimum wage rate. The adjustment shall increase the minimum wage by the rate of inflation. The increase shall be calculated by multiplying the otherwise applicable minimum wage by the 12-month percentage increase, if any, in the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, as published by the bureau of labor statistics Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States department of labor, Department of Labor, based upon on the most recent 12-month period for which data are available. The state treasurer shall publish the adjusted minimum wage rate shall be published by November 1 of the year it is calculated. and shall be The adjusted minimum wage rate is effective beginning January 1 of the immediately succeeding year. (3) An increase in the minimum hourly wage rate as prescribed in subsection (2) does not take effect if the unemployment rate, as determined by the bureau of labor statistics, Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States department of labor, Department of Labor, for this state is 8.5% or greater for the year immediately preceding the year of the prescribed increase.